North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 1. Nursing Home Licensure Act.

§ 131E-100.
Title; purpose.

This Part shall be known as the “Nursing Home Licensure Act.”

The purpose of the Nursing Home Licensure Act is to establish authority and duty for the Department to inspect and license private nursing homes.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-101.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, unless otherwise specified:

“Adult care home”, as distinguished from a nursing home, means a facility operated as a part of a nursing home and which provides residential care for aged or disabled persons whose principal need is a home with the shelter or personal care their age or disability requires. Medical care in an adult care home is usually occasional or incidental, such as may be required in the home of any individual or family, but the administration of medication is supervised. Continuing planned medical and nursing care to meet the resident’s needs may be provided under the direct supervision of a physician, nurse, or home health agency. Adult care homes are to be distinguished from nursing homes subject to licensure under this Part.

(1a)

“Combination home” means a nursing home offering one or more levels of care, including any combination of skilled nursing, intermediate care, and adult care home.

“Commission” means the North Carolina Medical Care Commission.

“Community advisory committee” means a nursing home advisory committee established for the statutory purpose of working to carry out the intent of the Nursing Home Patients’ Bill of Rights (Chapter 131E, Article 6, Part 2) in accordance with G.S. 143B-181.1.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 535, s. 21.

“Medical review committee” means a committee of a State or local professional society, of a medical staff of a licensed hospital, of physicians having privileges within the nursing home or of a peer review corporation or organization which is formed for the purpose of evaluating the quality, cost of or necessity for health care services under applicable federal statutes.

“Nursing home” means a facility, however named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or implied purpose of providing nursing or convalescent care for three or more persons unrelated to the licensee. A “nursing home” is a home for chronic or convalescent patients, who, on admission, are not as a rule, acutely ill and who do not usually require special facilities such as an operating room, X-ray facilities, laboratory facilities, and obstetrical facilities. A “nursing home” provides care for persons who have remedial ailments or other ailments, for which medical and nursing care are indicated; who, however, are not sick enough to require general hospital care. Nursing care is their primary need, but they will require continuing medical supervision.

“Peer review committee” means any committee appointed in accordance with

G.S. 131E-108

, “Peer review.”

“Quality assurance committee” means a committee, agency, or department of a state or local professional organization, of a medical staff of a licensed hospital, nursing home, of nurses or aides on the staff of a nursing home, or adult care home, of physicians having privileges within the nursing home, or adult care home, or of a peer review corporation or organization that is formed for the purpose of evaluating the quality, cost of, or necessity for health care services under applicable federal and State statutes, regulations, and rules.

History.

1961, c. 51, s. 3; 1981, c. 833; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1995, c. 535, s. 21; 2004-149, s. 2.1.

§ 131E-102.
Licensure requirements.

No person shall operate a nursing home without a license obtained from the Department. Any person may operate a nursing home or a combination home, as defined in this Part, in the same building or in two or more buildings adjoining or next to each other on the same site. Both a nursing home and a combination home must be licensed by the Department under this Part.

Applications shall be available from the Department, and each application filed with the Department shall contain all necessary and reasonable information that the Department may by rule require. A license shall be granted to the applicant upon a determination by the Department that the applicant has complied with the provisions of this Part and the rules promulgated under this Part. The Department shall charge the applicant a nonrefundable annual license fee in the amount of four hundred twenty dollars ($420.00) plus a nonrefundable annual per-bed fee of seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50).

A license to operate a nursing home shall be annually renewed upon the filing and the Department’s approval of the renewal application. A license shall not be renewed if outstanding fees and penalties imposed by the State against the home have not been paid. Fines and penalties for which an appeal is pending are exempt from consideration. The renewal application shall be available from the Department and shall contain all necessary and reasonable information that the Department may by rule require.

Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable except with the written approval of the Department.

In order for a nursing home to maintain its license it shall not intentionally impede the proper performance of the duties of a lawfully appointed community advisory committee as set forth in G.S. 131E-128(h).

History.

1961, c. 51, s. 3; 1963, c. 859; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1993, c. 530, s. 1; 2003-284, s. 34.3(a); 2005-276, s. 41.2(c); 2009-451, s. 10.76(g).

§ 131E-103.
Adverse action on a license.

Subject to subsection (b), the Department shall have the authority to deny a new or renewal application for a license, and to amend, recall, suspend or revoke an existing license upon a determination that there has been a substantial failure to comply with the provisions of this Part or the rules promulgated under this Part.

The provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act, shall govern all administrative action and judicial review in cases where the Department has taken the action described in subsection (a). A petition for a contested case shall be filed within 20 days after the Department mails the licensee a notice of its decision to deny a renewal application, or to recall, suspend, or revoke an existing license.

History.

1961, c. 51, s. 3; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1991, c. 143, s. 2; c. 761, s. 24.

§ 131E-104.
Rules and enforcement.

The Commission is authorized to adopt, amend, and repeal all rules necessary for the implementation of this Part.

The Commission shall adopt rules for the operation of the adult care portion of a combination home. The rules shall provide that for each requirement applicable to freestanding adult care homes or freestanding nursing homes, the combination home may choose to operate the adult care portion of the home in compliance with either the requirement applicable to freestanding adult care homes or the higher standard applicable to freestanding nursing homes.

The Department shall enforce the rules adopted or amended by the Commission with respect to nursing homes.

History.

1961, c. 51, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 614, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1995, c. 535, s. 22; 2000-154, s. 6.1.

§ 131E-105.
Inspections.

The Department shall inspect any nursing home and any adult care home operated as a part of a nursing home in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 8-53

, “Communications between physician and patient,” or any other provision of law relating to the confidentiality of communications between physician and patient, the representatives of the Department, when necessary for investigating compliance with this Part or rules promulgated by the Commission, may review any writing or other record in any recording medium which pertains to the admission, discharge, medication, treatment, medical condition, or history of persons who are or have been patients of the facility being inspected unless that patient objects in writing to review of that patient’s records. Physicians, psychologists, psychiatrists, nurses, and anyone else interviewed by representatives of the Department may disclose to these representatives information related to any inquiry, notwithstanding the existence of the physician-patient privilege in

G.S. 8-53

, “Communications between physician and patient,” or any other rules of law, if the patient has not made written objection to this disclosure. The facility, its employees, and any person interviewed during these inspections shall be immune from liability for damages resulting from the disclosure of any information which is provided without malice or fraud to the Department. Any confidential or privileged information received from review of records or interviews shall be kept confidential by the Department and not disclosed without written authorization of the patient or legal representative or unless disclosure is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. The Department shall institute appropriate policies and procedures to ensure that this information shall not be disclosed without authorization or court order. The Department shall not disclose the name of anyone who has furnished information concerning a facility without consent of that person. Neither the names of persons furnishing information nor any confidential or privileged information obtained from records or interviews shall be considered “public records” within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

, “ ‘Public records’ defined.” Prior to releasing any information or allowing any inspections referred to in this subsection, the patient must upon admission be advised in writing by the facility that the patient has the right to object in writing to the release of information or review of the records and that by an objection in writing the patient may prohibit the inspection or release of the records.

Authorized representatives of the Department with identification to this effect shall have at all times the right of proper entry upon any and all parts of the premises of any place in which entry is necessary to carry out the provisions of this Part or the rules adopted by the Commission. It shall be unlawful for any person to resist a proper entry by an authorized representative upon any premises other than a private dwelling.

History.

1981, c. 586, s. 1; c. 614, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1995, c. 535, s. 23.

§ 131E-106.
Evaluation of residents in adult care homes.

The Department shall prescribe the method of evaluation of residents in the adult care portion of a combination home in order to determine when any of these residents is in need of professional medical and nursing care as provided in licensed nursing homes.

History.

1963, c. 859; 1981, c. 833; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1995, c. 535, s. 24.

§ 131E-107.
Quality assurance, medical, or peer review committees.

A member of a duly appointed quality assurance, medical or peer review committee shall not be subject to liability for damages in any civil action on account of any act, statement or proceeding undertaken, made, or performed within the scope of the functions of the committee, if the committee member acts without malice or fraud, and if such peer review committee is approved and operates in accordance with

G.S. 131E-108

.

The proceedings of a quality assurance, medical, or peer review committee, the records and materials it produces and the materials it considers shall be confidential and not considered public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

, “ ‘Public records’ defined”, and shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action against a nursing home or a provider of professional health services that results from matters that are the subject of evaluation and review by the committee. No person who was in attendance at a meeting of the committee shall be required to testify in any civil action as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the proceedings of the committee or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of the committee or its members. However, information, documents, or records otherwise available are not immune from discovery or use in a civil action merely because they were presented during proceedings of the committee. Documents otherwise available as public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

do not lose their status as public records merely because they were presented or considered during proceedings of the committee. A member of the committee or a person who testifies before the committee may testify in a civil action but cannot be asked about the person’s testimony before the committee or any opinions formed as a result of the committee hearings.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1; 2004-149, s. 2.2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-149, s. 2.2, effective August 2, 2004, inserted “Quality assurance” in the section heading; inserted the subsection (a) designation; deleted “medical” preceding “quality assurance” in subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

§ 131E-108.
Peer review.

It is not a violation of

G.S. 131E-117(5)

for medical records to be disclosed to a private peer review committee if:

The peer review committee has been approved by the Department;

The purposes of the peer review committee are to:

Survey facilities to verify a high level of quality care through evaluation and peer assistance;

Resolve written complaints in a responsible and professional manner; and

Develop a basic core of knowledge and standards useful in establishing a means of measuring quality of care; and

The peer review committee keeps such records confidential.

History.

1979, c. 707; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 27.

§ 131E-109.
(Effective until December 1, 2021) Penalties.

Any person establishing, conducting, managing or operating any nursing home without a license shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall only be liable for a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for the first offense and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.

Any person acting under the authority of the Department who gives advance notice to an operator of a nursing home of the date or time that the nursing home is to be inspected shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. The inspection of a nursing home for initial licensure shall be exempt from the prohibition of prior notice. All subsequent inspections must comply with the provisions of this subsection.

The Secretary or a designee may suspend the admission of any new patients or residents at any nursing home or domiciliary home where the conditions of the nursing home or domiciliary home are detrimental to the health or safety of the patient or resident. This suspension shall remain in effect until the Secretary is satisfied that conditions or circumstances merit the removal of the suspension. This subsection shall be in addition to authority to suspend or revoke the license of the home. Any facility wishing to contest a suspension of admissions shall be entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The petition for a contested case shall be filed in the Office of Administrative Hearings within 20 days after the Department mails a written notice of suspension of admissions to the facility.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part, any person who violates any provision of this Part or who willfully fails to perform any act required, or who willfully performs any act prohibited by this Part, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor: Provided, however, that any person who willfully violates any rule adopted by the Commission under this Part or who willfully fails to perform any act required by, or who willfully performs any act prohibited by, these rules shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1977, c. 656, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 667, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1991, c. 143, s. 3; c. 761, s. 25; 1993, c. 539, s. 960; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 78(c).

§ 131E-109.
Penalties.

Any person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any nursing home without a license is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and upon conviction is only liable for a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for the first offense and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction is a separate offense.

Any person acting under the authority of the Department that gives advance notice to an operator of a nursing home of the date or time that the nursing home is to be inspected is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. The inspection of a nursing home for initial licensure is exempt from the prohibition of prior notice. All subsequent inspections shall comply with this subsection.

The Secretary or a designee of the Secretary may suspend the admission of any new patients or residents at any nursing home or domiciliary home where the conditions of the nursing home or domiciliary home are detrimental to the health or safety of the patient or resident. This suspension remains in effect until the Secretary is satisfied that conditions or circumstances merit the removal of the suspension. This subsection is in addition to the authority to suspend or revoke the license of the home. Any facility wishing to contest a suspension of admissions is entitled to an administrative hearing as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The petition for a contested case shall be filed in the Office of Administrative Hearings within 20 days after the Department mails a written notice of suspension of admissions to the facility.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part, any person that violates any provision of this Part, willfully fails to perform any act required by this Part, or willfully performs any act prohibited by this Part is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1977, c. 656, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 667, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1991, c. 143, s. 3; c. 761, s. 25; 1993, c. 539, s. 960; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 78(c); 2021-84, s. 11.

§ 131E-110.
Injunction.

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the Department may, in the manner provided by law, maintain an action in the name of the State for injunction or other process against any person to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management or operation of a nursing home without a license.

If any person shall hinder the proper performance of duty of the Secretary or a representative in carrying out the provisions of this Part, the Secretary may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the hindrance occurred for injunctive relief against the continued hindrance, irrespective of all other remedies at law.

Actions under this section shall be in accordance with Article 37 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes and Rule 65 of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-111.

Recodified as

G.S. 131E-255

by Session Laws 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 713, s. 3(a), as amended by Session Laws 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 713, s. 3(b), effective June 21, 1996.

§ 131E-112.
Waiver of rules for health care facilities that provide temporary shelter or temporary services during a disaster or emergency.

The Division of Health Service Regulation may temporarily waive, during disasters or emergencies declared in accordance with Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, any rules of the Commission pertaining to facilities or home care agencies to the extent necessary to allow the facility or home care agency to provide temporary shelter and temporary services requested by the emergency management agency. The Division may identify, in advance of a declared disaster or emergency, rules that may be waived, and the extent the rules may be waived, upon a disaster or emergency being declared in accordance with Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes. The Division may also waive rules under this subsection during a declared disaster or emergency upon the request of an emergency management agency and may rescind the waiver if, after investigation, the Division determines the waiver poses an unreasonable risk to the health, safety, or welfare of any of the persons occupying the facility. The emergency management agency requesting temporary shelter or temporary services shall notify the Division within 72 hours of the time the preapproved waivers are deemed by the emergency management agency to apply.

As used in this section, “emergency management agency” is as defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3

.

History.

1999-307, s. 1; 2007-182, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 2(u).

Cross References.

As to emergency management efforts, generally, see

G.S. 166A-19

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 1, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Division of Health Service Regulation” for “Division of Facility Services” at the beginning of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2012-12, s. 2(u), effective October 1, 2012, in subsection (a), substituted “Article 1A” for “Article 1” in the first and second sentences; and in subsection (b), substituted “G.S. 166A-19.3” for “G.S. 166A-4(2).”

§§
131E-112.1 through 131E-112.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 131E-112.5.
Secretary to establish visitation protocols during declared disasters and emergencies.

As used in this section and

G.S. 131E-112.6

, the following terms have the following meanings:

Disaster declaration. — As defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3(3)

.

Emergency. — As defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3(6)

.

Facility. — A nursing home or combination home licensed under this Part.

Normal visitation policy. — The visitation policy that was in effect at a facility on January 1, 2020.

The Secretary shall, in consultation with licensed operators of nursing homes and combination homes, and any other stakeholders the Secretary deems relevant, establish visitation protocols for residents of these facilities that will become effective during a disaster declaration or emergency that results in the suspension or curtailment of a facility’s normal visitation policy for any reason. The visitation protocols shall provide for at least the following:

Each resident shall have the right to designate one preapproved visitor and one preapproved alternate visitor. The preapproved visitor, or if the preapproved visitor is unavailable, the preapproved alternate visitor, shall be allowed to visit the resident at least twice per month during any period of time during which the facility’s normal visitation policy is suspended or curtailed for any reason during the declared disaster or emergency.

Prior to admission, each facility shall explain and provide to each resident written notification of the visitation protocols established by the Secretary under this section.

Visitation under these protocols shall be subject to Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services directives and to the guidelines, conditions, and limitations established by the facility as part of its normal visitation policy.

History.

2021-145, s. 2(a).

§ 131E-112.6.
(Effective April 1, 2022) Patient visitation rights for nursing home residents and combination home residents during a disaster declaration or emergency.

Notwithstanding any provision of this Part, Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the visitation protocols established by the Secretary under

G.S. 131E-112.5

shall be in effect during any period of time when (i) there is a declared disaster or emergency and (ii) a nursing home or combination home licensed under this Part suspends or restricts the normal visitation policy for any reason.

History.

2021-145, s. 2(a).

§ 131E-112.7.
Patient visitation rights for nursing home residents and combination home residents.

Each nursing or combination home licensed under this Part shall permit patients and residents to receive visitors to the fullest extent permitted under any applicable rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law.

In the event the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or any other federal agency finds a nursing or combination home has violated any rule, regulation, guidance, or federal law relating to a patient’s or resident’s visitation rights, the Department may issue a warning to the nursing or combination home about the violation and give the nursing or combination home not more than 24 hours to allow visitation. If visitation is not allowed after the 24-hour warning period, the Department shall impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each instance on each day the nursing or combination home was found to have a violation. This civil penalty shall be in addition to any fine or civil penalty that the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other federal agency may choose to impose.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, in the event that circumstances require the complete closure of a nursing or combination home to visitors, the nursing or combination home shall use its best efforts to develop alternate visitation protocols that would allow visitation to the greatest extent safely possible. If those alternate protocols are found by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or any other federal agency to violate any rule, regulation, guidance, or federal law relating to a patient’s or resident’s visitation rights, the Department may impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each instance on each day the nursing or combination home was found to have a violation. This civil penalty shall be in addition to any fine or civil penalty that the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other federal agency may choose to impose.

Each nursing or combination home shall provide notice of the patient and resident visitation rights in this act to patients and residents and, when possible, family members of patients and residents. The required notice shall also include the contact information for the agency or individuals tasked with investigating violations of nursing or combination home patient and resident visitation.

Subject to, and to the fullest extent permitted by, any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law, each nursing or combination home shall allow compassionate care visits. A nursing or combination home may require compassionate care visitors to submit to health screenings necessary to prevent the spread of infectious diseases, and, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, a nursing or combination home may restrict a compassionate care visitor who does not pass a health screening requirement or who has tested positive for an infectious disease. A nursing or combination home may require compassionate care visitors to adhere to infection control procedures, including wearing personal protective equipment. Compassionate care situations that require visits include, but are not limited to, the following:

End-of-life situations.

A resident who was living with his or her family before recently being admitted to the facility is struggling with the change in environment and lack of physical family support.

A resident who is grieving after a friend or family member recently passed away.

A resident who needs cueing and encouragement with eating or drinking, previously provided by family or caregivers, is experiencing weight loss or dehydration.

A resident, who used to talk and interact with others, is experiencing emotional distress, seldom speaking, or crying more frequently when the resident had rarely cried in the past.

History.

2021-171, s. 3; 2021-181, s. 2(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-171, s. 3, enacted this section as

G.S. 131E-112.5

. It was renumbered as 131E-112.7 at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2021-171 provides in its preamble: “Whereas, the COVID-19 pandemic has caused great uncertainty and anxiety across our State and has significantly affected patients and residents in health care facilities; and

“Whereas, health care facilities have made many efforts to keep patients and employees in a safe environment and have endeavored to minimize, to the extent possible, the risk of spread of the coronavirus disease; and

“Whereas, as a result of COVID-19 prevention measures, many unintended consequences have occurred to patients and residents of these facilities who were not diagnosed with COVID-19; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly has become aware of numerous patients and residents of health care facilities across our State who were not diagnosed with COVID-19, but as a result of visitation policies have been prohibited from having any visitors, including a spouse, parent, close family member, guardian, health care agent, or caregiver; and

“Whereas, many families have been unable to be physically present with their loved ones while in a hospital, nursing home, combination home, hospice care, adult care home, special care unit, or residential treatment setting for mental illness, developmental or intellectual disability, or substance use disorder, and have been limited to electronic video communications, if any, with the patient; and

“Whereas, the patients and residents who have been affected in the above-described manner have included adults, minors, and individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that it is in the interest of the State and its residents that these patients and residents of health care facilities, in compliance with the rules, regulations, and guidelines of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and federal law, should not be denied visitation by visitors of their choosing throughout the period of hospitalization or residential treatment; Now, therefore,”

Session Laws 2021-171, s. 1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The No Patient Left Alone Act.’” This section became effective November 1, 2021.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-181, s. 2(b), in subsection (e), in the introductory language, substituted “Subject to, and to the fullest extent permitted by, any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law, each” for “Each.”

§ 131E-113.
Immunization of employees and residents.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a nursing home licensed under this Part shall require residents and employees to be immunized against influenza virus and shall require residents to also be immunized against pneumococcal disease.

Upon admission, a nursing home shall notify the resident of the immunization requirements of this section and shall request that the resident agree to be immunized against influenza virus and pneumococcal disease.

(b1)

A nursing home shall notify every employee of the immunization requirements of this section and shall request that the employee agree to be immunized against influenza virus.

A nursing home shall document the annual immunization against influenza virus and the immunization against pneumococcal disease for each resident and each employee, as required under this section. Upon finding that a resident is lacking one or both of these immunizations or that an employee has not been immunized against influenza virus, or if the nursing home is unable to verify that the individual has received the required immunization, the nursing home shall provide or arrange for immunization. The immunization and documentation required shall occur not later than November 30 of each year.

For an individual who becomes a resident of or who is newly employed by the nursing home after November 30 but before March 30 of the following year, the nursing home shall determine the individual’s status for the immunizations required under this section, and if found to be deficient, the nursing home shall provide the immunization.

No individual shall be required to receive vaccine under this section if the vaccine is medically contraindicated, or if the vaccine is against the individual’s religious beliefs, or if the individual refuses the vaccine after being fully informed of the health risks of not being immunized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Commission for Public Health shall have the authority to adopt rules to implement the immunization requirements of this section.

As used in this section, “employee” means an individual who is a part-time or full-time employee of the nursing home.

History.

2000-112, ss. 3, 4; 2007-182, s. 1.3.

§ 131E-114.
Special care units; disclosure of information required.

A nursing home or combination home licensed under this Part that provides special care for persons with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias in a special care unit shall make the following disclosures pertaining to the special care provided that distinguishes the special care unit as being especially designed for residents with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias. The disclosure shall be made annually, in writing, to all of the following:

The Department, as part of its licensing procedures.

Each person seeking placement within a special care unit, or the person’s authorized representative, prior to entering into an agreement with the person to provide special care.

Information that must be disclosed in writing shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

A statement of the overall philosophy and mission of the licensed facility and how it reflects the special needs of residents with dementia.

The process and criteria for placement, transfer, or discharge to or from the special care unit.

The process used for assessment and establishment of the plan of care and its implementation, as required under State and federal law.

Typical staffing patterns and how the patterns reflect the resident’s need for increased care and supervision.

Dementia-specific staff training.

Physical environment features designed specifically for the special care unit.

Alzheimer’s disease and other dementia-specific programming.

Opportunities for family involvement.

Additional costs or fees to the resident for special care.

As part of its license renewal procedures and inspections, the Department shall examine for accuracy the written disclosures made by each licensed facility subject to this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a nursing home or combination home that does not offer a special care unit from admitting a person with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias. The disclosures required by this section apply only to a nursing home or combination home that advertises, markets, or otherwise promotes itself as providing a special care unit for persons with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias.

As used in this section, the term “special care unit” means a wing or hallway within a nursing home, or a program provided by a nursing home, that is designated especially for residents with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, or other special needs disease or condition, as determined by the Medical Care Commission, which may include mental disabilities.

History.

2000-154, s. 6.

Moratorium on Special Care Unit Licenses.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11G.3(a), (b), provides: “(a) For the period beginning July 1, 2017, and ending June 30, 2019, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation, shall not issue any licenses for special care units as defined in

G.S. 131D-4.6

and

G.S. 131E-114

. This prohibition shall not restrict the Department of Health and Human Services from doing any of the following:

“(1) Issuing a license to a facility that is acquiring an existing special care unit.

“(2) Issuing a license for a special care unit in any area of the State upon a determination by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services that increased access to this type of care is necessary in that area during the moratorium imposed by this section.

“(3) Processing all completed applications for special care unit licenses received by the Division of Health Service Regulation along with the applicable license fee prior to June 1, 2013.

“(4) Issuing a license to a facility that was in possession of a certificate of need as of July 31, 2013, that included authorization to operate special care unit beds.

“(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division by March 1, 2019, containing at least the following information:

“(1) The number of licensed special care units in the State.

“(2) The capacity of the currently licensed special care units to serve people in need of their services.

“(3) The anticipated growth in the number of people who will need the services of a licensed special care unit.

“(4) The number of applications received from special care units seeking licensure as permitted by this section and the number of those applications that were not approved.” For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12G.1(a), (b), as amended by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12G.5, as amended by Session Laws
2015-241, s. 12G.2(a).

§ 131E-114.1.
Posting of information indicating number of staff on duty.

Every nursing home subject to licensure under this Part shall post in a conspicuous place in the nursing home information about required staffing that enables residents and their families to readily ascertain each day the number of direct care staff and supervisors that are required by law to be on duty for that day.

History.

2001-85, s. 2; 2001-487, s. 85(b).